District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.07

Fees and funding.

(a)

The Mayor may establish fees, by rule, for the application for, and issuance of, each license, permit, and authorization required under this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter. The Mayor may establish the fees based on the class of license, vending location, or other relevant factors.

(b)

(1)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Vending Regulation Fund, which shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(2)

The following shall be deposited into the Fund:

(A)

Fees paid for the application for, and issuance or renewal of, a basic business license endorsed for vending;

(B)

Fees paid for the application for, and issuance or renewal of, a vending site permit or other licenses, permits, or authorizations issued by the Mayor under this chapter;

(C)

Funds authorized by an act of Congress, reprogramming, or intra-District transfer to be deposited into the Fund;

(D)

Any other funds designated by law or rule to be deposited into the Fund; and

(E)

Interest on funds deposited in the Fund.

(3)

All funds deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in paragraph (4) of this subsection, subject to authorization by Congress.

(4)

Funds in the Fund may be used to pay the costs of administering this chapter, including costs associated with the application for, and issuance and renewal of, a basic business license as set forth in paragraph (2)(A) of this subsection, and the administration and enforcement of any rules issued under this chapter.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 8, 56 DCR 6619
This section is referenced in § 37-131.01.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).